Washington statutes.
RCW 42.14.030

Legislature.

In the event that a catastrophic incident reduces the number of legislators available for duty, then those legislators available for duty shall constitute the legislature and shall have full power to act in separate or joint assembly by majority vote of those present. In the event of a catastrophic incident, (1) quorum requirements for the legislature shall be suspended, and (2) where the affirmative vote of a specified proportion of members for approval of a bill, resolution, or other action would otherwise be required, the same proportion of those voting thereon shall be sufficient. In the event of a catastrophic incident, the governor shall call the legislature into session as soon as practicable, and in any case within thirty days following the inception of the catastrophic incident. If the governor fails to issue such call, the legislature shall, on the thirtieth day from the date of inception of the catastrophic incident, automatically convene at the place where the governor then has his or her office. Each legislator shall proceed to the place of session as expeditiously as practicable. At such session or at any session in operation at the inception of the catastrophic incident, and at any subsequent sessions, limitations on the length of session and on the subjects which may be acted upon shall be suspended.

[ 2019 c 471 s 6; 2012 c 117 s 107; 1963 c 203 s 4.]

NOTES:

Contingent effective date—2019 c 471 ss 4-10: See note following RCW 42.14.010.

Finding—Intent—2019 c 471: See note following RCW 38.52.010.